Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5680
Rural Behavioral Health Training and Placement Program Act; act, how cited.

Sections 71-5680 to 71-5683 shall be known and may be cited as the Rural Behavioral Health Training and Placement Program Act.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 38.